District of Columbia statutes.
31-633

Confidentiality.

(a)

The Commissioner shall:

(1)

Treat and maintain applicants’ fingerprints and any criminal history record background information obtained under this chapter as confidential;

(2)

Apply security measures consistent with the Criminal Justice Information Services Division of the Federal Bureau of Investigation’s standards for the electronic storage of fingerprints and necessary identifying information; and

(3)

Limit the use of records solely for the purposes authorized by this chapter.

(b)

For the purposes of this chapter, any such records shall:

(1)

Not be deemed to be a public record within the meaning of § 2-502(18);

(2)

Not be subject to disclosure, except pursuant to a subpoena issued by order of a court of competent jurisdiction;

(3)

Be kept confidential by law and privileged; and

(4)

Not be subject to discovery or admissible in any private civil action.

June 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-143, § 103, 59 DCR 4069